District of Columbia statutes.
28-2907

Nonliability of third persons.

(a)

A person who participates in the acquisition, disposition, assignment or transfer of a security by or to a fiduciary including a person who guarantees the signature of the fiduciary is not liable for participation in any breach of fiduciary duty by reason of failure to inquire whether the transaction involves such a breach unless it is shown that he acted with actual knowledge that the proceeds of the transaction were being or were to be used wrongfully for the individual benefit of the fiduciary or that the transaction was otherwise in breach of duty.

(b)

When a corporation or transfer agent makes a transfer pursuant to an assignment by a fiduciary, a person who guaranteed the signature of the fiduciary is not liable on the guarantee to any person to whom the corporation or transfer agent by reason of this chapter incurs no liability.

(c)

This section does not impose any liability upon the corporation or its transfer agent.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 674, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2907.
1973 Ed., § 28-2907.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers.